Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. REPEALER 17 O.S. 2021, Section 190.21, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ENERGY AND NATURAL RESOURCES
OVERSIGHT, dated 02/26/2025 – DO PASS, As Coauthored.





HB2073 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.